Tennessee, session 114, SB1672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-23-104, is amended by deleting
"thirty (30) days" and substituting "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1672
010716
- 1 -